Massachusetts, session 194th, H1990.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 24W of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsections:-
(g) The attorney general, each district attorney and each police department shall file an
annual report with the executive office for administration and finance, the senate and house
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on the judiciary detailing all assets,
money and proceeds from the sale of assets seized pursuant to this section. The report shall
provide an itemized accounting for each seizure and forfeiture as required by section 47 of
chapter 94C. The report shall be filed not later than January 31 for the preceding calendar year
and shall be a public record.
of 3

SECTION 2: Section 47 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition is hereby amended by adding the following 2 subsections:-
(m) The executive office of administration and finance shall establish and maintain a case
tracking system and searchable public website that includes the following information about any
property seized or forfeited under state law: (i) the name of the law enforcement agency that
seized the property; (ii) the date of the seizure; (iii) the type and a description of the property
seized, including the make, model and year of any motor vehicle; (iv) the zip code of location of
the seizure; (v) the estimated value of the property seized; (vi) whether the property seized was
transferred to federal government; (vii) the crime charged, if any, related to the property that was
seized; (viii) the outcome of any charged crime under clause (vii); (ix) the criminal case number,
if charged; (x) the forfeiture case number; (xi) the type of forfeiture proceeding; (xii) whether a
property owner who files a claim or counterclaim, if applicable, was suspected of committing a
crime, an owner who was not suspected of committing a crime, a lienholder or another party or
whether there was no such filing by any party; (xiii) whether there was a default judgment,
forfeiture settlement or consent agreement; (xiv) the date of the forfeiture order; (xv) whether the
property was returned to the owner, partially returned to the owner, sold, destroyed or retained
by a law enforcement agency or is pending disposition; and (xvi) the total value of property
forfeited, including currency and proceeds from the sale of property, excluding the value of
contraband. Nothing in this subsection shall allow for the publication of information in violation
of any law or regulation relating to criminal offender record information or personally
identifiable information, or any other applicable privacy law. If an agency has made no seizures
or forfeitures during the previous year, a null report shall be filed by the agency specifying that it
of 3

did not engage in seizures or forfeitures during the reporting period. The executive office may
adopt rules necessary to implement this subsection.
(n) Annually, not later than January 31, the committee on public counsel services, in
collaboration with the trial court of the commonwealth, shall submit an annual report to the
senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint committee on the judiciary on the
provision of public counsel representation under this section, including, but not limited to, the:
(i) total number of cases involving public counsel representation under this section; (ii) number
of such cases where the property owner is a criminal defendant represented by public counsel in
a related criminal trial; and (iii) number of such cases where the property owner is not a criminal
defendant.”.
SECTION 3. Section 56 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsections:-
(k) The attorney general, each district attorney and each police department shall file an
annual report with the executive office for administration and finance, the senate and house
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on the judiciary detailing all assets,
money and proceeds from the sale of assets seized pursuant to this section. The report shall
provide an itemized accounting for each seizure and forfeiture as required by section 47 of
chapter 94C. The report shall be filed not later than January 31 for the preceding calendar year
and shall be a public record.
of 3